Maine, session 132, LD2207.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §8, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 475, §2 and affected
by §3, is further amended to read:
1. It is a defense that prosecution was commenced after the expiration of the applicable
period of limitations provided in this section, except that the following prosecutions may
be commenced at any time:
A. A prosecution for murder or criminal homicide in the first or 2nd degree; or
B. If the victim had not attained the age of 18 years at the time of the crime, a
prosecution for incest; unlawful sexual contact; sexual abuse of a minor; rape or gross
sexual assault, formerly denominated as gross sexual misconduct; unlawful sexual
touching; or sexual exploitation of a minor.; or
C. If the victim had not attained the age of 18 years at the time of the crime, a
prosecution for aggravated sex trafficking or commercial sexual exploitation of a
minor. The provisions of this paragraph apply only to those crimes of aggravated sex
trafficking or commercial sexual exploitation of a minor committed on or after
September 1, 2026 or for which the prosecution was not barred by the statute of
limitations in force immediately prior to September 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §8, sub-§2-A, as amended by PL 2025, c. 479, §1, is further
amended to read:
2-A. A Except as provided in subsection 1, paragraphs B and C, a prosecution for a
Class A, Class B or Class C crime involving unlawful sexual contact or gross sexual assault
or a prosecution for a Class A or Class B crime involving aggravated sex trafficking must
be commenced within 20 years after it is committed.
This subsection does not apply to a Class D crime enhanced to a Class C crime pursuant to
section 1604, subsection 5, paragraph B.
Page 1 - 132LR3040(03)